Utah statutes.
75-6-312.   Rules of construction.

(1)  This part shall be liberally construed and applied to promote its underlying purposes and policy and to make uniform the laws with respect to the subject of this part among states enacting it.

(2)  Unless displaced by the particular provisions of this part, the principles of law and equity supplement its provisions.

